New York, session 2025-2026, S10082.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 64-a to read as follows: 3 § 64-a. Prohibition of foreign gas and electric corporations. 1. No 4 gas corporation, electric corporation, or combination gas and electric 5 corporation shall be owned, controlled, or operated, directly or indi- 6 rectly, by a foreign government, a foreign state-owned enterprise, or a 7 foreign corporation. For the purposes of this section, "foreign corpo- 8 ration" shall mean a corporation as defined in section one hundred two 9 of the business corporation law that is formed under the laws of a 10 jurisdiction outside of the United States. 11 2. Any gas corporation, electric corporation, or combination gas and 12 electric corporation currently in violation of this section shall, with- 13 in thirty-six months of the effective date of this section, submit and 14 execute a divestiture plan to be approved by the commission. Such plan 15 shall ensure the transfer of controlling interest to a domestic entity 16 without disruption of service or cost-shifting to ratepayers. 17 § 2. Section 65 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 18 subdivision 17 to read as follows: 19 17. (a) No gas corporation or electric corporation shall recover from 20 ratepayers, nor shall the commission approve any rate that includes, the 21 cost of any bonus or incentive-based compensation for an executive offi- 22 cer during a fiscal year in which such corporation has implemented a 23 rate increase that exceeds the annual percentage increase in the consum- 24 er price index for all urban consumers for the previous calendar year. 25 (b) The total annual bonus or incentive-based compensation for any 26 executive officer of a gas corporation or electric corporation shall not EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15664-01-6 S. 10082 2 1 exceed twenty-five percent of the median annual salary of the corpo- 2 ration's full-time equivalent non-executive employees residing within 3 the state of New York. 4 (c) Any executive compensation paid in excess of the limits estab- 5 lished in paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall be paid exclusively 6 from shareholder profits and shall not be considered a "just and reason- 7 able" expense for ratemaking purposes. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 9 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.